Utah statutes.
26-8a-203.   Data collection.

(1)  The committee shall specify the information that shall be collected for the emergency medical services data system established pursuant to Subsection (2).

(2)  The department shall establish an emergency medical services data system which shall provide for the collection of information, as defined by the committee, relating to the treatment and care of patients who use or have used the emergency medical services system.

(3)  Persons providing emergency medical services shall provide information to the department for the emergency medical services data system established pursuant to Subsection (2).



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

